Maryland, session 2026, HB1033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–4109.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CHAMBER” MEANS A CHAMBER OF COMMERCE IN THE STATE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1033*

HOUSE BILL 1033
(3) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND CHAMBER OF COMMERCE
GRANT PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS A MARYLAND CHAMBER OF COMMERCE GRANT PROGRAM IN
THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO CHAMBERS
FOR THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES:
(1) MEMBERSHIP SUBSIDIES FOR UNDERREPRESENTED
INDIVIDUALS; AND
(2) INTER–CHAMBER EVENTS.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP A UNIFIED APPLICATION
REQUIRING THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(1) GRANT TYPE;
(2) CHAMBER PROGRAMMING AND CAPACITY TO SUPPORT GRANT
ACTIVITIES;
(3) POINT OF CONTACT RESPONSIBLE FOR GRANT ADMINISTRATION;
(4) PROJECTED TIMELINE;
(5) PROPOSED BUDGET;
(6) ADDITIONAL INFORMATION AS SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
AND
(7) FOR MEMBERSHIP SUBSIDIES, A BRIEF JUSTIFICATION OF WHY A
POTENTIAL MEMBER IS UNDERREPRESENTED IN A CHAMBER.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) REVIEW APPLICATIONS;
(2) DETERMINE AWARD AMOUNTS; AND
(3) NOTIFY CHAMBERS REGARDING AN AWARD.

HOUSE BILL 1033 3
(F) (1) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A MEMBERSHIP GRANT, A CHAMBER SHALL
DEMONSTRATE:
(I) OPPORTUNITIES FOR PROGRAMMING, SERVICES,
MENTORING, OR NETWORKING FOR NEWLY ENROLLED MEMBERS; AND
(II) ANNUAL FUNDING FOR AT LEAST ONE FULL–TIME PAID
POSITION.
(2) MEMBERSHIP GRANTS MAY BE USED FOR 1 YEAR OF THE
LOWEST–TIER CHAMBER MEMBERSHIP AT NO COST TO UNDERREPRESENTED
INDIVIDUALS.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISBURSE A MEMBERSHIP GRANT TO A
CHAMBER WITHIN 14 DAYS AFTER THE CHAMBER ENROLLS A MEMBER.
(4) CHAMBERS THAT RECEIVE MEMBERSHIP GRANTS SHALL SUBMIT
AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT WITH THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUAL AWARDS; AND
(II) PARTICIPANT FEEDBACK ON THE UTILITY OF THE
CHAMBER’S PROGRAMMING.
(G) (1) TWO OR MORE CHAMBERS MAY APPLY JOINTLY FOR AN
INTER–CHAMBER GRANT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) AN APPLICATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A PLAN FOR THE PROPOSED EVENT;
(II) EXPECTED ATTENDANCE; AND
(III) COST.
(3) ELIGIBLE USES OF INTER–CHAMBER GRANTS INCLUDE:
(I) VENUE EXPENSES;
(II) EVENT PROMOTION;
(III) STAFF SUPPORT; AND

HOUSE BILL 1033
(IV) RELATED COSTS.
(4) CHAMBERS RECEIVING INTER–CHAMBER GRANTS SHALL SUBMIT
A REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT AFTER EACH EVENT WITH THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION:
(I) ATTENDANCE;
(II) EVENT ACTIVITIES; AND
(III) RECEIPTS FOR EVENT EXPENDITURES.
(H) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $100,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR
THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.